South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S390.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Board of Education, relating to Assessment Program, designated as Regulation Document Number 5359, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. Regulation 43-262.I. outlines the statewide assessment program, including the testing of public-school students at selected grade levels and in selected content and skill areas. The SCDE proposes to update outdated language in the regulation. Specifically, the No Child Left Behind Act is no longer in effect. It was replaced with the Every Student Succeeds Act in 2015. Changing the name to Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) or prevailing legislation would allow the regulation to be updated to the current legislation and allow for change in the future without a request for a regulation change. Additionally, the name of the state summative assessment, South Carolina Palmetto Assessment of State Standards, SCPASS, is no longer in use. SC READY replaced that assessment and is the current assessment. By changing the name to SC READY or the corresponding state assessment would allow the regulation to be updated to the current test and allow for change in the future without a regulation change request. This updates the current names of items and provides for prevailing terminology in future updates. The Notice of Drafting for the proposed amendments to the regulation was published in the State Register on August 23, 2024. ----XX----